Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.069

Assessment of punishment—Revocation of deferred or suspended sentence—Limitations—Termination of probation.

Deferral of sentence and suspension of execution of sentence may be revoked if the defendant violates or fails to carry out any of the conditions of the deferral or suspension. Upon the revocation of the deferral or suspension, the court may impose the sentence previously suspended or any unexecuted portion thereof. In no case shall the court impose a sentence greater than the original sentence, with credit given for time served and money paid on fine and costs.

Any time before entering an order terminating probation, the court may revoke or modify its order suspending the imposition or execution of the sentence. Whenever the ends of justice will be served and when warranted by the reformation of the probationer, the court may terminate the period of probation and discharge the person so held.

[ 1983 c 156 s 3; 1969 c 75 s 3.]